Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 6. FOOD, DRUGS, ALCOHOL, AND HAZARDOUS SUBSTANCES

SUBTITLE B. ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAMS

CHAPTER 461A. DEPARTMENT OF STATE HEALTH SERVICES: CHEMICAL DEPENDENCY SERVICES AND RELATED PROGRAMS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 461A.001. POLICY. Chemical dependency is a preventable and treatable illness and public health problem affecting the general welfare and the economy of this state. The legislature recognizes the need for proper and sufficient facilities, programs, and procedures for prevention, intervention, treatment, and rehabilitation. It is the policy of this state that a person with a chemical dependency shall be offered a continuum of services that will enable the person to lead a normal life as a productive member of society.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 461A.002. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Chemical dependency" means:

(A) abuse of alcohol or a controlled substance;

(B) psychological or physical dependence on alcohol or a controlled substance; or

(C) addiction to alcohol or a controlled substance.

(2) "Commission" means the Health and Human Services Commission.

(3) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of state health services.

(4) "Controlled substance" means a:

(A) toxic inhalant; or

(B) substance designated as a controlled substance by Chapter 481.

(5) "Department" means the Department of State Health Services.

(6) "Executive commissioner" means the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission.

(7) "Intervention" means the interruption of the onset or progression of chemical dependency in the early stages.

(8) "Prevention" means the reduction of a person's risk of abusing alcohol or a controlled substance or becoming chemically dependent.

(9) "Rehabilitation" means the reestablishment of the social and vocational life of a person after treatment.

(10) "Toxic inhalant" means a gaseous substance that is inhaled by a person to produce a desired physical or psychological effect and that may cause personal injury or illness to the person.

(11) "Treatment" means the initiation and promotion, in a planned, structured, and organized manner, of a person's chemical-free status or the maintenance of a person free of illegal drugs.

(12) "Treatment facility" means a public or private hospital, a detoxification facility, a primary care facility, an intensive care facility, a long-term care facility, an outpatient care facility, a community mental health center, a health maintenance organization, a recovery center, a halfway house, an ambulatory care facility, another facility that is required to be licensed and approved by the department under Chapter 464, or a facility licensed or operated under Title 7 that provides treatment services. The term does not include an educational program for intoxicated drivers or the individual office of a private, licensed health care practitioner who personally renders private individual or group services within the scope of the practitioner's license and in the practitioner's office.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 461A.003. IMPLEMENTATION BY DEPARTMENT. The department shall implement this chapter for the purpose of preventing broken homes and the loss of lives.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 461A.004. COOPERATION WITH DEPARTMENT. (a) Each department, agency, officer, and employee of the state, when requested by the department, shall cooperate with the department in appropriate activities to implement this chapter.

(b) This section does not give the department control over existing facilities, institutions, or agencies or require the facilities, institutions, or agencies to serve the department in a manner that is inconsistent with the functions, the authority, or the laws and rules governing the activities of the facilities, institutions, or agencies.

(c) This section does not authorize the department to use a private institution or agency without its consent or to pay a private institution or agency for services that a public institution or agency is willing and able to provide.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Text of section effective until April 01, 2025

Sec. 461A.005. CONFLICT WITH OTHER LAW. To the extent a power or duty given to the department or commissioner by this chapter conflicts with Section 531.0055, Government Code, Section 531.0055 controls.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.50, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 461A.005. CONFLICT WITH OTHER LAW. To the extent a power or duty given to the department or commissioner by this chapter conflicts with any of the following provisions of the Government Code, the Government Code provision controls:

(1) Subchapter A, Chapter 524;

(2) Section 524.0101;

(3) Sections 524.0151(a)(2) and (b);

(4) Section 524.0202; and

(5) Section 525.0254.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.50, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES OF DEPARTMENT, COMMISSIONER, AND EXECUTIVE COMMISSIONER

Sec. 461A.051. POWERS AND DUTIES OF EXECUTIVE COMMISSIONER. The executive commissioner shall:

(1) adopt rules governing the functions of the department in relation to chemical dependency services and related programs, including rules that prescribe the policies and procedures followed by the department in administering chemical dependency services and related programs; and

(2) by rule and based on criteria proposed by the department, establish minimum criteria that peer assistance programs must meet to be governed by and entitled to the benefits of a law that authorizes licensing and disciplinary authorities to establish or approve peer assistance programs for impaired professionals.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 461A.052. POWERS AND DUTIES OF DEPARTMENT.

(a) The department shall:

(1) provide for research and study of the problems of chemical dependency in this state and seek to focus public attention on those problems through public information and education programs;

(2) plan, develop, coordinate, evaluate, and implement constructive methods and programs for the prevention, intervention, treatment, and rehabilitation of chemical dependency in cooperation with federal and state agencies, local governments, organizations, and persons, and provide technical assistance, funds, and consultation services for statewide and community-based services;

(3) cooperate with and enlist the assistance of:

(A) other state, federal, and local agencies;

(B) hospitals and clinics;

(C) public health, welfare, and criminal justice system authorities;

(D) educational and medical agencies and organizations; and

(E) other related public and private groups and persons;

(4) expand chemical dependency services for children when funds are available because of the long-term benefits of those services to this state and its citizens;

(5) sponsor, promote, and conduct educational programs on the prevention and treatment of chemical dependency, and maintain a public information clearinghouse to purchase and provide books, literature, audiovisuals, and other educational material for the programs;

(6) sponsor, promote, and conduct training programs for persons delivering prevention, intervention, treatment, and rehabilitation services and for persons in the criminal justice system or otherwise in a position to identify the service needs of persons with a chemical dependency and their families;

(7) require programs rendering services to persons with a chemical dependency to safeguard those persons' legal rights of citizenship and maintain the confidentiality of client records as required by state and federal law;

(8) maximize the use of available funds for direct services rather than administrative services;

(9) consistently monitor the expenditure of funds and the provision of services by all grant and contract recipients to assure that the services are effective and properly staffed and meet the standards adopted under this chapter;

(10) make the monitoring reports prepared under Subdivision (9) a matter of public record;

(11) license treatment facilities under Chapter 464;

(12) use funds appropriated to the department for purposes of providing chemical dependency services and related programs to carry out those purposes and maximize the overall state allotment of federal funds;

(13) plan, develop, coordinate, evaluate, and implement constructive methods and programs to provide healthy alternatives for youth at risk of selling controlled substances; and

(14) submit to the federal government reports and strategies necessary to comply with Section 1926 of the federal Alcohol, Drug Abuse, and Mental Health Administration Reorganization Act, Pub. L. No. 102-321 (42 U.S.C. Section 300x-26), and coordinate the reports and strategies with appropriate state governmental entities.

Text of subsection effective until April 01, 2025

(b) The department may establish regional alcohol advisory committees consistent with the regions established under Section 531.024, Government Code.

Text of subsection effective on April 01, 2025

(b) The department may establish regional alcohol advisory committees consistent with the regions established under Section 525.0151, Government Code.

(c) The department may appoint advisory committees to assist the department in performing its duties under this chapter. A member of an advisory committee appointed under this subsection may receive reimbursement for travel expenses as provided by Section 2110.004, Government Code.

(d) The department shall comply with federal and state laws related to program and facility accessibility.

(e) The commissioner shall prepare and maintain a written plan that describes how a person who does not speak English can be provided reasonable access to the department's programs and services under this chapter.

(f) Subsection (a)(15) does not apply to a 12-step or similar self-help alcohol dependency recovery program:

(1) that does not offer or purport to offer an alcohol dependency treatment program;

(2) that does not charge program participants; and

(3) in which program participants may maintain anonymity.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 948 (S.B. 1480), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.51, eff. April 1, 2025.

Sec. 461A.053. EMERGENCY TREATMENT RESOURCES. The commissioner may develop emergency treatment resources for persons who appear to be:

(1) chemically dependent;

(2) under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance and in need of medical attention; or

(3) undergoing withdrawal or experiencing medical complications related to a chemical dependency.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 461A.054. REFERRAL SERVICES FOR PERSONS FROM CRIMINAL JUSTICE SYSTEM. (a) The commissioner may establish programs for the referral, treatment, or rehabilitation of persons from the criminal justice system within the terms of bail, probation, conditional discharge, parole, or other conditional release.

(b) A referral may not be inconsistent with medical or clinical judgment or conflict with this chapter or Chapter 462 or applicable federal regulations.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 461A.055. REPORTING OF CHILDREN INVOLVED IN SUBSTANCE ABUSE OR FROM FAMILY INVOLVED IN SUBSTANCE ABUSE. (a) The department in the context of mental health services, the commission, the Department of Aging and Disability Services, and the Texas Juvenile Justice Department shall:

(1) attempt to determine whether a child under the agency's jurisdiction is involved in substance abuse or is from a substance-abusing family;

(2) record its determination in the case record of the child; and

(3) record the information for statistical reporting purposes.

(b) The agencies shall revise their assessment forms, as needed, to include a determination under this section.

(c) The department shall coordinate the efforts of the agencies described by Subsection (a) in complying with this section.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 461A.056. STATEWIDE SERVICE DELIVERY PLAN.

Text of subsection effective until April 01, 2025

(a) The department shall develop and adopt a statewide service delivery plan. The department shall update the plan not later than February 1 of each even-numbered year. The plan must include:

(1) a statement of the department's mission, goals, and objectives regarding chemical dependency prevention, intervention, and treatment;

(2) a statement of how chemical dependency services and chemical dependency case management services should be organized, managed, and delivered;

(3) a comprehensive assessment of:

(A) chemical dependency services available in this state at the time the plan is prepared; and

(B) future chemical dependency services needs;

(4) a service funding process that ensures equity in the availability of chemical dependency services across this state and within each service region established under Section 531.024, Government Code;

(5) a provider selection and monitoring process that emphasizes quality in the provision of services;

(6) a description of minimum service levels for each region;

(7) a mechanism for the department to obtain and consider local public participation in identifying and assessing regional needs for chemical dependency services;

(8) a process for coordinating and assisting administration and delivery of services among federal, state, and local public and private chemical dependency programs that provide similar services; and

(9) a process for coordinating the department's activities with those of other state health and human services agencies and criminal justice agencies to avoid duplications and inconsistencies in the efforts of the agencies in chemical dependency prevention, intervention, treatment, rehabilitation, research, education, and training.

Text of subsection effective on April 01, 2025

(a) The department shall develop and adopt a statewide service delivery plan. The department shall update the plan not later than February 1 of each even-numbered year. The plan must include:

(1) a statement of the department's mission, goals, and objectives regarding chemical dependency prevention, intervention, and treatment;

(2) a statement of how chemical dependency services and chemical dependency case management services should be organized, managed, and delivered;

(3) a comprehensive assessment of:

(A) chemical dependency services available in this state at the time the plan is prepared; and

(B) future chemical dependency services needs;

(4) a service funding process that ensures equity in the availability of chemical dependency services across this state and within each service region established under Section 525.0151, Government Code;

(5) a provider selection and monitoring process that emphasizes quality in the provision of services;

(6) a description of minimum service levels for each region;

(7) a mechanism for the department to obtain and consider local public participation in identifying and assessing regional needs for chemical dependency services;

(8) a process for coordinating and assisting administration and delivery of services among federal, state, and local public and private chemical dependency programs that provide similar services; and

(9) a process for coordinating the department's activities with those of other state health and human services agencies and criminal justice agencies to avoid duplications and inconsistencies in the efforts of the agencies in chemical dependency prevention, intervention, treatment, rehabilitation, research, education, and training.

(b) The department shall gather information needed for the development of the plan through systematic methods designed to include local, regional, and statewide perspectives.

(c) In developing the plan, the department shall analyze the costs of implementation of proposed features of the plan by both the department and service providers. The department shall use the analysis to maximize the efficiency of service delivery under the final plan.

(d) The plan must provide a priority for obtaining treatment services for individuals in need of treatment who are parents of a child in foster care.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.52, eff. April 1, 2025.

Sec. 461A.057. STATE AGENCY SERVICES STANDARDS. (a) The executive commissioner by rule shall develop model program standards for substance abuse services for use by each state agency that provides or pays for substance abuse services. The department shall provide the model standards to each agency that provides substance abuse services as identified by the commission.

(b) Model standards developed under Subsection (a) must be designed to improve the consistency of substance abuse services provided by or through a state agency.

(c) Biennially the department shall review the model standards developed under Subsection (a) and determine whether each standard contributes effectively to the consistency of service delivery by state agencies.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 461A.059. OPIOID ANTAGONIST PROGRAM. (a) In this section, "opioid antagonist" has the meaning assigned by Section 483.101.

(b) From funds available for that purpose, the executive commissioner shall operate a program to provide opioid antagonists for the prevention of opioid overdoses in a manner determined by the executive commissioner to best accomplish that purpose.

(c) The executive commissioner may provide opioid antagonists under the program to emergency medical services personnel, first responders, public schools, institutions of higher education as defined by Section 481.134, community centers, and other persons likely to be in a position to respond to an opioid overdose.

(d) The commission may accept gifts, grants, and donations to be used in administering this section.

(e) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1167 (H.B. 3285), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 924 (S.B. 867), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER C. SERVICES AND PROGRAMS

Sec. 461A.101. LOCAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH AUTHORITIES. The department may designate and provide services through local behavioral health authorities as provided by Section 533.0356 and rules adopted by the executive commissioner.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 461A.102. EDUCATION AND RESEARCH PROGRAMS CONCERNING CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES. (a) In this section, "controlled substances" means those substances designated as controlled substances by Chapter 481.

(b) The department, in cooperation with other appropriate state agencies, shall carry out educational programs designed to prevent or deter misuse and abuse of controlled substances. In connection with those programs the department may:

(1) promote better recognition of the problems of misuse and abuse of controlled substances within the regulated industry and among interested groups and organizations;

(2) assist the regulated industry and interested groups and organizations in contributing to the reduction of misuse and abuse of controlled substances;

(3) consult with interested groups and organizations to aid those groups in solving administrative and organizational problems;

(4) evaluate procedures, projects, techniques, and controls conducted or proposed as part of educational programs on misuse and abuse of controlled substances;

(5) disseminate the results of research on misuse and abuse of controlled substances to promote a better public understanding of problems that exist and ways to combat those problems; and

(6) assist in educating and training state and local law enforcement officials in their efforts to control misuse and abuse of controlled substances.

(c) The department shall encourage research on misuse and abuse of controlled substances. In connection with research, and in furtherance of the enforcement of Chapter 481, the commissioner may:

(1) establish methods to assess accurately the effects of controlled substances and identify and characterize those with potential for abuse;

(2) make studies and undertake programs of research to:

(A) develop new or improved approaches, techniques, systems, equipment, and devices to strengthen the enforcement of Chapter 481;

(B) determine patterns and social effects of misuse and abuse of controlled substances; and

(C) improve methods for preventing, predicting, understanding, and dealing with the misuse and abuse of controlled substances; and

(3) contract with public agencies, institutions of higher education, and private organizations or individuals to conduct research, demonstrations, or special projects that directly pertain to the misuse and abuse of controlled substances.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 461A.103. OUTREACH PROGRAMS FOR INTRAVENOUS DRUG USERS. (a) In this section, "HIV" means human immunodeficiency virus.

(b) The department may fund community outreach programs that have direct contact with intravenous drug users.

(c) An outreach program funded by the department must:

(1) provide education on HIV infection based on the model education program developed by the department;

(2) encourage behavior changes to reduce the possibility of HIV transmission;

(3) promote other HIV risk reduction activities; and

(4) encourage behavior consistent with state criminal laws.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 461A.104. MINIMUM PROGRAM REQUIREMENTS. (a) In this section, "coping skills training" means instruction in the elements and practice of and reasons for the skills of communication, stress management, problem solving, daily living, and decision making.

(b) A chemical dependency intensive intervention, outpatient, residential treatment, or rehabilitation program that is provided by the department or that is funded wholly or partly by funds allocated through the department must include:

(1) coping skills training;

(2) education regarding the manifestations and dynamics of dysfunctional relationships within the family; and

(3) support group opportunities for children and adults.

(c) This section does not apply to:

(1) a detoxification program or that part of a program that provides detoxification; or

(2) a program provided by the Texas Juvenile Justice Department.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 461A.105. RELAPSE RATE REPORTING. (a) A treatment program provided or funded by the department shall report to the department on the effectiveness of the chemical dependency treatment program.

(b) The report must show to the extent possible, without violating the confidentiality of information received by the program, the rate of relapse of persons who have received treatment services.

(c) The executive commissioner by rule may provide for the content of a report and the procedure for reporting under this section. Reports must be uniform in classifications of persons receiving treatment according to the severity of addiction, substance abused, age of person treated, and modality of treatment. A report may not reveal the name of an individual subject to treatment or of a family member or acquaintance of an individual treated and may not describe circumstances from which any of those individuals may be identified.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 461A.106. COMPULSIVE GAMBLING PROGRAM. (a) The department shall establish a program for:

(1) public education, research, and training regarding problem or compulsive gambling; and

(2) the treatment and prevention of problem or compulsive gambling.

(b) The department's program under Subsection (a) must include:

(1) establishing and maintaining a list of Internet sites and toll-free "800" telephone numbers of nonprofit entities that provide crisis counseling and referral services to families experiencing difficulty as a result of problem or compulsive gambling;

(2) promoting public awareness regarding the recognition and prevention of problem or compulsive gambling;

(3) facilitating, through in-service training and other means, the availability of effective assistance programs for problem or compulsive gamblers; and

(4) conducting studies to identify adults and juveniles in this state who are, or who are at risk of becoming, problem or compulsive gamblers.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER D. SERVICE CONTRACTS

Sec. 461A.151. CLIENT SERVICE CONTRACT STANDARDS. (a) In each contract for the purchase of chemical dependency program-related client services, the department shall include:

(1) clearly defined contract goals, outputs, and measurable outcomes that relate directly to program objectives;

(2) clearly defined sanctions or penalties for failure to comply with or perform contract terms or conditions; and

(3) clearly specified accounting, reporting, and auditing requirements applicable to money received under the contract.

(b) Contract goals must include a standard developed by the department that is based on a percentage of program clients who maintain long-term recovery for an extended period as defined by the department.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 461A.152. CONTRACT MONITORING. The department shall establish a formal program to monitor program-related client services contracts made by the department. The department must:

(1) monitor compliance with financial and performance requirements using a risk assessment methodology; and

(2) obtain and evaluate program cost information to ensure that each cost, including an administrative cost, is reasonable and necessary to achieve program objectives.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 461A.153. TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM. The department shall adopt technical assistance policies and procedures for a technical assistance program that:

(1) is clearly separate from the department's contract monitoring activities;

(2) has a single office for technical assistance requests; and

(3) includes explicit response time frames.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER E. FUNDING

Sec. 461A.201. FINANCES. (a) The department may accept gifts and grants for the purposes of providing chemical dependency services and related programs.

(b) The department is the state agency that receives and administers federal funds for alcohol and drug abuse, including applying for, administering, and disbursing funds under the federal Drug Abuse Prevention, Treatment, and Rehabilitation Act (21 U.S.C. Section 1101 et seq.). The executive commissioner prescribes all necessary department policies relating to alcohol and drug abuse.

(c) An organization or other entity is not eligible for a grant of state funds from the department under this chapter unless the organization or entity provides matching funds in either cash or in-kind contributions equal to at least five percent of the total grant of state funds from the department. The department may waive that requirement if the department determines that the requirement may jeopardize the provision of needed services.

(d) In allocating grant funds, the department shall consider the state facility hospitalization rate of substance abusers who are from the service area of the entity requesting the grant. An organization or other entity is not eligible for a grant of state funds for a treatment or rehabilitation program unless the program will, at a minimum, reduce state facility hospitalization of substance abusers by a percentage established by the department.

(e) As a condition to receiving contract or grant funds under this chapter, a public or private organization or entity must provide to the department information relating to:

(1) the number of persons with a chemical dependency the organization or entity served, if any, during the preceding year, the municipalities and counties of residence of those persons, and the number of persons served from each municipality and county; and

(2) the number of persons with a chemical dependency the organization or entity expects to serve during the term of the requested grant or contract, the expected municipalities and counties of residence for those persons, and the expected number of persons served from each municipality and county.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 461A.202. SERVICES FUNDING. (a) The executive commissioner by rule shall adopt a system of funding the provision of chemical dependency services that includes competitive and noncompetitive procedures to:

(1) maximize the range of treatment services available in each service region;

(2) provide reasonable access in each region to available services; and

(3) include local public participation in making regional funding decisions and formal funding recommendations.

(b) The system must require that the department award each proposed chemical dependency services contract to the applicant that the department determines has made the bid that provides the best value.

(c) In determining the best value bid for a contract under this section, the department shall consider:

(1) the quality of the proposed service;

(2) cost;

(3) the applicant's ability to:

(A) perform the contract;

(B) provide the required services; and

(C) provide continuity of service;

(4) whether the applicant can perform the contract or provide the services within the period required, without delay or interference;

(5) the applicant's history of:

(A) contract performance; and

(B) compliance with the laws relating to the applicant's business operations and the affected services;

(6) whether the applicant's financial resources are sufficient to perform the contract and to provide the services;

(7) whether necessary or desirable support and ancillary services are available to the applicant;

(8) the degree of community support for the applicant;

(9) the quality of the facilities and equipment available to or proposed by the applicant;

(10) the ability of the applicant to meet all applicable written department policies, principles, and rules;

(11) state investment in the applicant; and

(12) other factors the department determines relevant.

(d) Rules adopted under this section must set out the department's provider selection processes, including:

(1) service purchase methods;

(2) eligibility criteria;

(3) provider selection criteria; and

(4) selection determination procedures.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 461A.203. FUNDING POLICY MANUAL. (a) The department shall publish a funding policy manual that explains:

(1) the department's funding priorities and provider selection criteria; and

(2) the methods the department used to develop funding policies.

(b) The department shall update the manual annually.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 461A.204. UNIT RATE REIMBURSEMENT. (a) In this section, "unit rate reimbursement" means reimbursement for a service paid at a specified rate for a unit of the service provided to a client multiplied by the number of units provided.

(b) The department shall study the procurement of and payment for chemical dependency treatment services on a unit rate reimbursement basis.

(c) If the department determines, after consideration of the study, that procurement of and payment for chemical dependency treatment services on a unit rate reimbursement basis in appropriate areas of the state would result in obtaining the highest quality treatment services at the best price and the lowest administrative cost to the department, the department shall adopt a unit rate reimbursement system for those services. The system must:

(1) include competitive procurement;

(2) monitor provider performance;

(3) monitor the reasonableness of provider costs and expenditures;

(4) verify provider costs before and after a contract term to ensure rates are set appropriately;

(5) ensure accountability of providers; and

(6) contain costs.

(d) The department may procure and pay for chemical dependency prevention and intervention services under a unit rate reimbursement system when the department determines it is appropriate.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1158, eff. April 2, 2015.